District of Columbia statutes.
47-206

Reimbursement of United States for expenses of United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit.

(a)

Until the day before the effective date of the District of Columbia Court Reorganization Act of 1970, the Commissioner of the District of Columbia shall reimburse the United States for 30% of the expenditures made on or before that day for the expenses of the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit. During the 30-month period beginning on such effective date, the Executive Officer of the District of Columbia Courts shall reimburse the United States for expenditures made during that period for such expenses at the following rates of reimbursement:

(1)

Twenty per centum for the first 18 months of such period; and

(2)

Ten per centum for the remainder of such period.

(b)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no reimbursement for such expenses shall be required after the expiration of the 30-month period beginning on such effective date.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 592, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 173(d)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-206.
1973 Ed., § 47-204b.

References in Text

“The effective date of the District of Columbia Court Reorganization Act of 1970,” referred to in the first sentence of subsection (a) of this section, means, as set forth in § 199(c) of the Act, the first day of the seventh calendar month which began after the enactment of the Act (February 1, 1971).